Utah statutes.
59-10-505.   Return by minor.
(1)  As used in this section, "parent" includes an individual who is entitled
to the services of an individual who is a minor by reason of having parental
rights and duties with respect to the individual who is a minor.
(2)  If an individual who is a minor is required to make a return under this
chapter, the return shall include:
(a)  all income attributable to the individual's personal services; and
(b)  all other items of the individual's income.
(3)  The income of an individual who is a minor may not be included on the
return of the individual's parent.
(4)  An expenditure attributable to the income of an individual who is a minor
that is made by the individual or the individual's parent is considered to
have been paid or incurred by the individual who is a minor.
(5)  A tax assessed against an individual who is a minor, to the extent
attributable to income from personal services, if not paid by the individual,
for all purposes is considered as being properly assessable against the
individual's parent.
